District of Columbia statutes.
29-101.04

Delivery of record.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this title, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, mail by the United States Postal Service, commercial delivery service, and electronic transmission.

(b)

Delivery to the Mayor shall be effective only when the record is received by the Mayor.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720